Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Elliott State Research Forest Authority, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $4,002,152 for
biennial expenses.
Passed by House June 13, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5048 (HB 5048-A) Page 1